Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1203
Vessel, defined.

Vessel shall mean every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane on the water, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 3.